Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB914.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 620 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A social service worker shall wear a department-issued body-worn camera during
an investigation pursuant to KRS 620.050 when the social service worker:
(a) Visits the child's residence or placement;
(b) Interviews a child outside a school setting; and
(c) Removes a child from the home pursuant to a court order.
(2) Recordings shall be preserved for at least five (5) years and, notwithstanding KRS
620.050(5), be made available to the court and to the custodial parent or legal
guardian of the child alleged to be dependent, neglected, or abused and his or her
Page 1 of 17
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2490
attorney.
(3) If a social service worker fails to activate his or her body-worn camera without
documented exigent circumstances, there shall be a rebuttable presumption in
favor of the parent's account of events in a proceeding under this chapter or KRS
Chapter 625.
(4) The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A to implement this section.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 620 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A parent shall have a cause of action against an employee of the cabinet who:
(a) Knowingly submits a false statement;
(b) Withholds exculpatory evidence; or
(c) Violates a person's constitutional rights.
(2) It shall not be a defense or immunity to an action brought against an employee or
agent of the cabinet in his or her official capacity that the employee or agent:
(a) Acted in good faith and within the scope of his or her employment or
authority in exercising discretion and judgment or personal deliberation in
performing an act or omission;
(b) Believed, reasonably or otherwise, that his or her conduct was lawful at the
time it was committed; or
(c) Deprived legal rights, privileges, or immunities, by an act or omission, that
were not clearly established at the time of their deprivation, or that the state
of the law was otherwise such that the employee or agent could not
reasonably have been expected to know whether his or her conduct was
lawful.
(3) In an action brought under this section, the court shall award attorney's fees to a
prevailing plaintiff.
Page 2 of 17
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2490
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 605 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
The cabinet shall submit an annual report by July 1 of each year to the Legislative
Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint Committee on Families and
Children that contains the following information:
(1) The number of children removed from the custody of a parent or other person
exercising custodial control or supervision; and
(2) The average caseload for social service workers and a statement of compliance
with KRS 199.461.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 194A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) There is hereby established in the State Treasury a trust and agency account to be
known as the family preservation fund. The fund shall consist of moneys received
from state appropriations, gifts, grants, and federal funds.
(2) The fund shall be administered by the cabinet.
(3) Amounts deposited in the fund shall be used for:
(a) Substance abuse treatment;
(b) Parental education;
(c) Housing stabilization;
(d) Mental health services; and
(e) Domestic violence intervention;
and for no other purpose.
(4) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, fund amounts not expended at the close of a fiscal
year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward into the next fiscal year.
Section 5. KRS 600.010 is amended to read as follows:
(1) KRS Chapters 600 to 645 shall be known as the Kentucky Unified Juvenile Code.
(2) KRS Chapters 600 to 645 shall be interpreted to effectuate the following express
Page 3 of 17
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2490
legislative purposes:
(a) The Commonwealth shall direct its efforts to promoting protection of
children; to the strengthening and encouragement of family life for the
protection and care of children; to strengthening and maintaining the
biological family unit; to ensuring that policies and practices utilized are
supported by data and research and are monitored or measured for their
effectiveness in achieving the intended results; and to offering all available
resources to any family in need of them;
(b) It also shall be declared to be the policy of this Commonwealth that:
1. All efforts shall be directed toward providing each child a safe and
nurturing home;
2. Emphasis shall be placed on involving families in interventions
developed for youth, providing families with access to services
necessary to address issues within the family, and increasing
accountability of the youth and families within the juvenile justice
system;
3. To the extent possible, out-of-home placement should only be utilized
for youth who are high-risk or high-level offenders, and that low-risk,
low-level offenders should be served through evidence-based
programming in their community; and
4. As the population in Department of Juvenile Justice facilities is reduced
through increased use of community-based treatment, and if staffing
ratios can be maintained at the levels required by accreditation bodies,
reductions of the number of facilities should be considered;
(c) The court shall show that other less restrictive alternatives have been
attempted or are not feasible in order to insure that children are not removed
from families except when absolutely necessary;
Page 4 of 17
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2490
(d) Any child brought before the court under KRS Chapters 600 to 645 shall have
a right to treatment reasonably calculated, through the use of evidence-based
programs when available, to bring about an improvement of his or her
condition and, to the extent possible, have that treatment administered in the
county of residence of the custodial parent or parents or in the nearest
available county;
(e) KRS Chapter 635 shall be interpreted to promote the best interests of the child
through providing treatment and sanctions to reduce recidivism and assist in
making the child a productive citizen by involving the family, as appropriate,
and by advancing the principles of personal responsibility, accountability, and
reformation, while maintaining public safety, and seeking restitution and
reparation;
(f) KRS Chapter 640 shall be interpreted to promote public safety and the
concept that every child be held accountable for his or her conduct through
the use of restitution, reparation, and sanctions, in an effort to rehabilitate
delinquent youth; and
(g) It shall further be the policy of this Commonwealth to provide judicial
procedures in which rights and interests of all parties, including the parents
and victims, are recognized and all parties are assured prompt and fair
hearings. Unless otherwise provided, such protections belong to the child
individually and may not be waived by any other party.
(3) (a) KRS Chapters 600 to 645 shall be interpreted consistently with federal law
and constitutional protections of parental rights.
(b) A provision of KRS Chapter 600 to 645 or any other child welfare statute of
the Commonwealth in conflict with federal protections of parental rights is
void to the extent of the conflict.
(c) The court shall apply strict scrutiny when reviewing state action that
Page 5 of 17
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2490
interferes with the fundamental rights of a parent relating to the parent-
child relationship.
Section 6. KRS 610.070 is amended to read as follows:
(1) All cases involving children brought before the court whose cases are under the
jurisdiction of the court shall be granted a speedy hearing and shall be dealt with by
the court without a jury.
(2) The hearings shall be conducted in a formal manner, unless specified to the contrary
by other provisions of KRS Chapters 600 to 645.
(3) The general public shall be excluded and only the immediate families or guardians
of the parties before the court, witnesses necessary for the prosecution and defense
of the case, the probation worker with direct interest in the case, a representative
from the Department of Juvenile Justice, the victim, his or her parent or legal
guardian, or if emancipated, his or her spouse, or a legal representative of either,
such persons admitted as the judge shall find have a direct interest in the case or in
the work of the court, and such other persons as agreed to by the child and his or
her attorney may be admitted to the hearing. A parent, legal guardian, or spouse if a
witness shall be admitted to the hearing only during and after his or her testimony at
the hearing, and witnesses shall be admitted to the hearing only for the duration of
their testimony. The court may order the exclusion of a parent, legal guardian, or
spouse, if it is shown to the satisfaction of the court that the parent, legal guardian,
or spouse may physically disrupt the proceedings or may do violence to any
participant therein. The mere presence of a parent, legal guardian, or spouse shall
not be deemed to be a disruption of the proceedings merely because their presence
may make the defendant uncomfortable; the court shall find a potential for actual
physical disruption of the proceedings before an exclusion may be granted for this
reason.
(4) The court shall order at least one (1) parent, guardian, or person exercising
Page 6 of 17
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2490
custodial control over the child to be present at any hearing or other proceeding
involving the child. The court shall make accommodations necessary to allow the
person to attend, including but not limited to allowing remote attendance or holding
hearings outside the court's normal operating hours.
(5) In dependency, neglect, and abuse actions, all hearings shall be audio and video
recorded. Recordings shall be preserved as part of the official record and parents
shall have access to a recording at no cost. A hearing shall not occur without
recording unless the court finds it necessary to protect a child victim's privacy.
Section 7. KRS 620.060 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The court for the county where the child ordinarily resides or will reside or the
county where the child is present may issue an ex parte emergency custody order
when it appears to the court that removal is in the best interest of the child and the
court finds by clear and convincing evidence[ that there are reasonable grounds to
believe], as supported by affidavit or by recorded sworn testimony, that one (1) or
more of the following conditions exist and that the parents or other person
exercising custodial control or supervision are unable or unwilling to protect the
child:
(a) The child is in danger of imminent death or serious physical injury or is being
sexually abused;
(b) The parent has repeatedly inflicted or allowed to be inflicted by other than
accidental means physical injury or emotional injury. This condition shall not
include reasonable and ordinary discipline recognized in the community
where the child lives, as long as reasonable and ordinary discipline does not
result in abuse or neglect[ as defined in KRS 600.020(1)]; or
(c) The child is in immediate danger due to the parent's failure or refusal to
provide for the safety or needs of the child.
(2) Custody may be placed with a relative taking into account the wishes of the
Page 7 of 17
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2490
custodial parent and child or any other appropriate person or agency including the
cabinet.
(3) An emergency custody order shall be effective no longer than seventy-two (72)
hours[,] exclusive of weekends and holidays, unless there is a temporary removal
hearing with oral or other notice to the county attorney and the parent or other
person exercising custodial control or supervision of the child[,] to determine if the
child should be held for a longer period. The seventy-two (72) hour period also may
be extended or delayed upon the waiver or request of the child's parent or other
person exercising custodial control or supervision.
(4) Any person authorized to serve process shall serve the parent or other person
exercising custodial control or supervision with a copy of the emergency custody
order. If such person cannot be found, the sheriff shall make a good faith effort to
notify the nearest known relative, neighbor, or other person familiar with the child.
(5) Within seventy-two (72) hours of the taking of a child into custody without the
consent of his parent or other person exercising custodial control or supervision, a
petition shall be filed pursuant to this chapter.
(6) This section[Nothing herein] shall not preclude the issuance of arrest warrants
pursuant to the Rules of Criminal Procedure.
Section 8. KRS 620.080 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Unless waived by the child and his parent or other person exercising custodial
control or supervision, a temporary removal hearing shall be held:
(a) Within twenty-four (24)[seventy-two (72)] hours[,] excluding weekends and
holidays[,] of the time when an emergency custody order is issued or when a
child is taken into custody without the consent of his parent or other person
exercising custodial control or supervision; and
(b) In cases commenced by the filing of a petition, within ten (10) days of the
date of filing.
Page 8 of 17
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2490
(2) (a) At a temporary removal hearing, the court shall determine whether there are
reasonable grounds to believe that the child would be dependent, neglected or
abused if returned to or left in the custody of his parent or other person
exercising custodial control or supervision even though it is not proved
conclusively who has perpetrated the dependency, neglect or abuse. For good
cause, the court may allow hearsay evidence.
(b) The court shall not order removal under this section unless the
Commonwealth proves by clear and convincing evidence, as supported by
affidavit or by recorded sworn testimony, that one (1) of more of the
following conditions exist and that the parents or other person exercising
custodial control or supervision are unable or unwilling to protect the child:
1. The child is in danger of imminent death or serious physical injury or
is being sexually abused;
2. The parent has repeatedly inflicted or allowed to be inflicted by other
than accidental means physical injury or emotional injury. This
condition shall not include reasonable and ordinary discipline
recognized in the community where the child lives, as long as
reasonable and ordinary discipline does not result in abuse or neglect;
or
3. The child is in immediate danger due to the parent's failure or refusal
to provide for the safety or needs of the child.[The Commonwealth
shall bear the burden of proof by a preponderance of the evidence and if
the Commonwealth should fail to establish same,]
(c) The child shall be released to or retained in the custody of his or her parent or
other person exercising custodial control or supervision if the Commonwealth
fails to meet the burden of proof.
Section 9. KRS 620.090 is amended to read as follows:
Page 9 of 17
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2490
(1) If, after completion of the temporary removal hearing, the court finds there are
reasonable grounds to believe the child is dependent, neglected or abused, the court
shall:
(a) Issue an order for temporary removal and shall grant temporary custody to the
cabinet or other appropriate person or agency. Preference shall be given to
available and qualified relatives of the child considering the wishes of the
parent or other person exercising custodial control or supervision, if known.
The order shall state the specific reasons for removal and show that alternative
less restrictive placements and services have been considered. The court may
recommend a placement for the child;
(b) Inquire as to an existing child support order; and
(c) If there is no existing order, or if the order is to be amended, the court shall:
1. Make specific findings, either written or on the record, as to:
a. The child support obligation in the best interest of the child;
b. The action to be taken by the payee, payor, or any other party by
making an application for services to the child support office who
shall take all appropriate action; or
c. Setting a hearing as soon as practicable; and
2. Require proper service before establishing a new child support order.
(2) (a) In placing a child under an order of temporary custody, the cabinet or its
designee shall use the least restrictive appropriate placement available.
Preference shall be given to available and qualified relatives of the child
considering the wishes of the parent or other person exercising custodial
control or supervision, if known. The child may also be placed in a facility or
program operated or approved by the cabinet, including a foster home, or any
other appropriate available placement. However, under no circumstance shall
the child be placed in a home, facility, or other shelter with a child who has
Page 10 of 17
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2490
been committed to the Department of Juvenile Justice for commission of a sex
crime as that term is defined in KRS 17.500, unless the child committed for
the commission of a sex crime is kept segregated from other children in the
home, facility, or other shelter that have not been committed for the
commission of a sex crime.
(b) If placement is not made with relatives or fictive kin, the cabinet shall
provide a written explanation to the court explaining the reasons for the
placement.
(3) If the court finds there are not reasonable grounds to believe the child is dependent,
neglected or abused, or if no action is taken within seventy-two (72) hours, the
emergency custody order shall be dissolved automatically and the cabinet or its
designee shall return the child to the parent or other person exercising custodial
control or supervision. A request for a continuance of the hearing by the parent or
other person exercising custodial control or supervision shall constitute action
precluding automatic dissolution of the emergency custody order.
(4) When the court issues a temporary order for the custody of a child, the court may
order that, within two (2) weeks, arrangements be made for the child to receive a
thorough medical, visual, and dental examination by a professional authorized by
the Kentucky Revised Statutes to conduct such examinations. The costs of the
examination shall be paid by the cabinet.
(5) The child shall remain in temporary custody with the cabinet for a period of time
not to exceed forty-five (45) days from the date of the removal from his home. The
court shall conduct the adjudicatory hearing and shall make a final disposition
within forty-five (45) days of the removal of the child. The court may extend such
time after making written findings establishing the need for the extension and after
finding that the extension is in the child's best interest.
(6) If custody is granted to a grandparent of the child pursuant to this section, the court
Page 11 of 17
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2490
shall consider granting reasonable visitation rights to any other grandparent of the
child if the court determines the grandparent has a significant and viable
relationship with the child as established in KRS 405.021(1)(c).
Section 10. KRS 620.155 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any interested party aggrieved by a proceeding under KRS 610.010(2)(d) including
the parent, child, guardian ad litem, the cabinet, and the county attorney may appeal
from the juvenile court to the Circuit Court as a matter of right in the manner
provided in the Kentucky Rules of Civil Procedure. The Circuit Court may order
that the child may be removed to a suitable place, pending the appeal, if it appears
by affidavit or sworn testimony that the child would be in imminent danger if left
with or returned to his or her parents, guardian, or other person party to the appeal.
(2) An appeal of a removal order shall be heard within twenty-four (24) hours of the
order.
Section 11. KRS 625.090 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Circuit Court may involuntarily terminate all parental rights of a parent of a
named child[,] if the Circuit Court finds from the record by clear and convincing
evidence that:
(a) 1. The child has been adjudged to be an abused or neglected child, as
defined in KRS 600.020(1), by a court of competent jurisdiction;
2. The child is found to be an abused or neglected child, as defined in KRS
600.020(1), by the Circuit Court in this proceeding;
3. The child is found to have been diagnosed with neonatal abstinence
syndrome at the time of birth, unless his or her birth mother:
a. Was prescribed and properly using medication for a legitimate
medical condition as directed by a health care practitioner that may
have led to the neonatal abstinence syndrome;
b. Is currently, or within ninety (90) days after the birth, enrolled in
Page 12 of 17
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2490
and maintaining substantial compliance with both a substance
abuse treatment or recovery program and a regimen of prenatal
care or postnatal care as recommended by her health care
practitioner throughout the remaining term of her pregnancy or the
appropriate time after her pregnancy; or
c. In the absence of a prescription for the treatment of a legitimate
medical condition, agrees, prior to discharge from the hospital, to
participate in a court-ordered assessment by a drug treatment
provider and the assigning of a certified peer support specialist for
referral to appropriate treatment, and agrees to participate in
treatment which shall commence within ninety (90) days after the
birth; or
4. The parent has been convicted of a criminal charge relating to the
physical or sexual abuse or neglect of any child and that physical or
sexual abuse, neglect, or emotional injury to the child named in the
present termination action is likely to occur if the parental rights are not
terminated;
(b) 1. The Cabinet for Health and Family Services has filed a petition with the
court pursuant to KRS 620.180 or 625.050; or
2. A child-placing agency licensed by the cabinet, any county or
Commonwealth's attorney, or a parent has filed a petition with the court
under KRS 625.050; and
(c) Termination would be in the best interest of the child.
(2) [No ]Termination of parental rights shall not be ordered unless the Circuit Court
also finds by clear and convincing evidence the existence of one (1) or more of the
following grounds:
(a) That the parent has abandoned the child for a period of not less than ninety
Page 13 of 17
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2490
(90) days;
(b) That the parent has inflicted or allowed to be inflicted upon the child, by other
than accidental means, serious physical injury;
(c) That the parent has continuously or repeatedly inflicted or allowed to be
inflicted upon the child, by other than accidental means, physical injury or
emotional harm;
(d) That the parent has been convicted of a felony that involved the infliction of
serious physical injury to any child;
(e) That the parent, for a period of not less than six (6) months, has continuously
or repeatedly failed or refused to provide or has been substantially incapable
of providing essential parental care and protection for the child and that there
is no reasonable expectation of improvement in parental care and protection,
considering the age of the child;
(f) That the parent has caused or allowed the child to be sexually abused or
exploited;
(g) That the parent, for reasons other than poverty alone, has continuously or
repeatedly failed to provide or is incapable of providing essential food,
clothing, shelter, medical care, or education reasonably necessary and
available for the child's well-being and that there is no reasonable expectation
of significant improvement in the parent's conduct in the immediately
foreseeable future, considering the age of the child;
(h) That:
1. The parent's parental rights to another child have been involuntarily
terminated;
2. The child named in the present termination action was born subsequent
to or during the pendency of the previous termination; and
3. The conditions or factors which were the basis for the previous
Page 14 of 17
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2490
termination finding have not been corrected;
(i) That the parent has been convicted in a criminal proceeding of having caused
or contributed to the death of another child as a result of physical or sexual
abuse or neglect;
(j) That the child has been in foster care under the responsibility of the cabinet
for fifteen (15) cumulative months out of forty-eight (48) months preceding
the filing of the petition to terminate parental rights; or
(k) That the child has been removed from the biological or legal parents more
than two (2) times in a twenty-four (24) month period by the cabinet or a
court.
(3) In determining the best interest of the child and the existence of a ground for
termination, the Circuit Court shall consider the following factors:
(a) Whether the parent is a mentally ill person[Mental illness] as defined by
KRS 202A.011(9)[,] or an individual with an intellectual disability as defined
by KRS 202B.010(9),[ of the parent] as certified by a qualified mental health
professional, or whether the parent has a disability as defined in KRS
199.011, if the mental illness, intellectual disability, or disability renders the
parent consistently unable to care for the immediate and ongoing physical or
psychological needs of the child for extended periods of time;
(b) Acts of abuse or neglect as defined in KRS 600.020(1) toward any child in the
family;
(c) If the child has been placed with the cabinet, whether the cabinet has, prior to
the filing of the petition:
1. Made reasonable efforts as defined in KRS 620.020 to reunite the child
with the parents unless one or more of the circumstances enumerated in
KRS 610.127 for not requiring reasonable efforts have been
substantiated in a written finding by the District Court; or
Page 15 of 17
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2490
2. Provided a parent with a disability as defined in KRS 199.011 with
targeted adaptive and supportive services based on an individual
assessment of the parent, or has received a written acknowledgement
from the parent knowingly and affirmatively rejecting the offered
services;
(d) The efforts and adjustments the parent has made in his or her circumstances,
conduct, or conditions to make it in the child's best interest to return the child
to his or her home within a reasonable period of time, considering the age of
the child;
(e) The physical, emotional, and mental health of the child and the prospects for
the improvement of the child's welfare if termination is ordered; and
(f) The payment or the failure to pay a reasonable portion of substitute physical
care and maintenance if financially able to do so.
(4) If the cabinet has not made reasonable efforts as defined in KRS 620.020 to
reunite the child with the parents and one (1) or more of the circumstances
enumerated in KRS 610.127 for not requiring reasonable efforts have not been
substantiated in a written finding by the District Court, the court shall not order
termination of parental rights.
(5) If the child has been placed with the cabinet, the parent may present testimony
concerning the reunification, adaptive or supportive services offered by the cabinet,
and whether additional services would be likely to bring about lasting parental
adjustment enabling a return of the child to the parent.
(6)[(5)] If the parent proves by a preponderance of the evidence that the child will not
continue to be an abused or neglected child as defined in KRS 600.020(1) if
returned to the parent, or if the parent proves by a preponderance of the evidence
that appropriate and specifically targeted adaptive or supportive services based
upon an individual assessment of the parent have not been offered or provided to
Page 16 of 17
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2490
the parent, the court in its discretion may determine not to terminate parental rights.
(7)[(6)] Upon the conclusion of proof and argument of counsel, the Circuit Court shall
enter findings of fact, conclusions of law, and a decision as to each parent-
respondent within thirty (30) days either:
(a) Terminating the right of the parent; or
(b) Dismissing the petition and stating whether the child shall be returned to the
parent or shall remain in the custody of the state.
Section 12. This Act may be cited as the Protection of the Children Act.
Section 13. This Act shall take effect January 1, 2027.
Page 17 of 17
XXXX 3/4/2026 8:53 AM Jacketed